Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 7. Child Support Enforcement

§ 780.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Court” means the court with jurisdiction over the proceeding.

“Employer” means any employer or payor of wages of any type to the obligor.

“Obligee” means the person found to be legally entitled to receive support or any person to whom the obligee has assigned or authorized all rights of collection.

“Obligor” means the person required to pay support under a support order.

“Registry” means the registry established in

33 V.S.A. § 4103

.

“Support” means periodic payments ordered for the support of dependent children or, for the purposes of sections 783-790 of this title only, a spouse. Support includes periodic amounts to be applied toward unpaid arrearages.

“Support order” means any judgment, order or contract for support enforceable in this state, including, but not limited to, orders issued pursuant to 15 V.S.A. chapter 5 (relating to desertion and support and parentage), 7 (relating to URESA) or 11 (relating to annulment and divorce).

“Wage withholding order” means a transfer from the obligor to the obligee of the right to receive a portion of the obligor’s wages directly from the obligor’s employer.

“Wages” means any compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether designated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and shall include periodic payments under pension or retirement programs, workers’ compensation, or insurance policies of any type.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 5;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 781.
Withholding wages upon issuance or modification of support order after July 1, 1990.

All orders for child support made or modified on or after July 1, 1990 shall include an order for immediate wage withholding in an amount equal to the support obligation and any obligation to pay support arrearages, unless the court finds good cause not to order immediate wage withholding or the parties have entered into an alternative arrangement by written agreement which is affirmatively stated in the order. In determining good cause, the court may consider a history of financial responsibility toward the family and the absence of any threat by the obligor to withhold financial support from the family.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 6;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 63

, § 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

§ 782.
Expedited procedure for wage withholding.

In the case of an order for child support made or modified after July 1, 1990 that does not include an order for immediate wage withholding, an obligee may request a wage withholding order when any amount due under the order has not been paid within seven business days after the amount is due. The obligor may request wage withholding at any time. The petition for wage withholding shall set forth:

the amount of support arrearages, if any;

the terms of the support order;

the periodic amount to be withheld for support and arrearages; and

a statement that the obligor may object to wage withholding on the basis of an error in the amount of current support or arrearages or an error in identity, at a hearing to be held within 14 days of the date the petition is filed.

The petition shall be served upon the other party or parties as provided in section 783 of this title.

The court shall set the date for the hearing and notify the parties of the place, date, and time. The hearing shall be held within 14 days of the date the petition is filed.

The court shall enter a judgment for wage withholding under any one of the following circumstances:

The obligor does not appear at the hearing without good cause.

The obligor has requested the wage withholding order.

The court finds after hearing that any amount due under a support order has not been paid within seven business days after the amount is due.

In all cases the court shall issue an order for wage withholding, if any, within 15 days of notice sent to the responding party.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the Office of Child Support may notify an employer to initiate wage withholding without obtaining a modification of the court order if any amount due under the order has accumulated to one-twelfth of the annualized amount of child support after:

verifying the arrears based on a sworn statement of the obligee or, if the Office of Child Support has maintained the financial records, an employee familiar with the financial records; and

notifying the obligor of the withholding pursuant to subsection 783(b) of this title and giving the obligor an opportunity to object and request a hearing in Family Division of the Superior Court to contest the withholding on the grounds that the withholding or the amount withheld is improper due to a mistake of fact.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 7;

1987, No. 54

, § 1, eff. May 15, 1987;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 3a;

1997, No. 63

, § 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2009, No. 154

, § 238;

2017, No. 11

, § 42.

§ 783.
Wage withholding; notice and hearing.

In the case of a child support order issued prior to July 1, 1990 or a spousal support order, an obligee may request a wage withholding order when any amount due under a support order has not been paid within seven business days after the amount is due. The obligor may request wage withholding at any time. The petition for wage withholding shall set forth:

the amount of support arrearages, if any;

the terms of the support order;

the periodic amount to be withheld for support and arrearages;

a statement that the obligor may object to wage withholding on the basis of an error in the amount of current support or arrearages or an error in identity, by filing the objection with the court within 20 days of receiving the petition under this subsection;

a statement that an obligor may move for modification of the support order because of a real, substantial and unanticipated change of circumstances, which includes a difference of 10 percent or more between the child support order and the amount required to be paid under the support guidelines.

The petition shall be served by the court or the Office of Child Support by personal service or by mailing to the obligor, at one or more of the addresses supplied by the obligor, by certified mail, return receipt requested and delivery restricted to the addressee, the expense being paid by the petitioner. If acceptance of service is refused, the court or the Office of Child Support may serve the obligor by sending the petition to the obligor by ordinary first class mail and by certifying that such service has been made. In the alternative, the court or the Office of Child Support may provide for mail service as provided in V.R.C.P. 4(e).

If the obligor does not file an objection to wage withholding within 20 days of receiving the petition sent pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or if the obligor has requested the wage withholding order, the court shall enter a judgment for wage withholding as stated in the petition without requiring a hearing or additional motions or additional affidavits, and shall send copies to the parties.

If the obligor files an objection, the matter shall be set for hearing within 20 days of receipt of the objection.

The court shall order wage withholding if the obligor has requested wage withholding or if any amount due under a support order has not been paid within seven business days after the amount is due. In all cases the court shall issue a wage withholding order, if any, within 45 days of notice sent to the responding party.

If a petition for wage withholding and a motion for modification are filed in connection with the same order, the court shall hear the matters at the same time if it is possible to do so within the time limits established by this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 8;

1987, No. 54

, § 2, eff. May 15, 1987;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 63

, § 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2017, No. 11

, § 43.

§ 784.
Repealed.
1985, No. 63 § 22(1).

§ 785.
Wage withholding orders.

A wage withholding order shall set forth:

the annualized amount of child support;

frequency of the child support payment;

judgment for support arrearages, if any;

provisions for periodic repayment of arrearages;

appropriate reduction and termination dates.

A wage withholding order shall require an employer to withhold a periodic amount of child support up to the maximum amount permitted under section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (

15 U.S.C. § 1673(b))

. All wage withholdings shall be made payable to the Registry.

The court shall file a wage withholding order with the Registry. Within seven business days of receipt of the order, the Registry shall provide the obligor’s employer with notice of withholding by first class mail and send a copy of the notice and the order to the obligor and the obligee.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 9;

1987, No. 54

, § 3, eff. May 15, 1987;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 11

, § 44.

§ 786.
Obligee’s responsibility.

The obligee shall notify the registry and the obligor of any event that would affect the amount of support to be withheld under the order. Any person who has assigned or authorized all rights of collection shall notify the assignee of any event that would affect the amount of support to be withheld under the order. Notice shall be in writing, mailed or delivered within seven days of any such event.

Any amounts received by the obligee in excess of the amounts required to be withheld under any wage withholding order shall be paid by the obligee to the registry within seven days of receipt.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 10;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 787.
Employer’s responsibility; compensation.

Upon receipt of notice of wage withholding under this chapter or under a similar law of another state, an employer shall:

withhold from the wages paid to the obligor the periodic support amount specified in the order for each wage period;

within seven working days after wages are withheld, forward the withheld wages to the registry and specify the date the support was withheld from wages;

retain a record of all withheld wages;

cease withholding wages upon notice from the court or the registry; and

notify the registry within 10 days of the date the obligor’s employment is terminated.

In addition to the amounts withheld pursuant to this subchapter, the employer may retain not more than $5.00 per month from the obligor’s wages as compensation for administrative costs incurred.

Any employer who fails to withhold wages pursuant to a wage withholding order within 10 working days of receiving actual notice or upon the next payment of wages to the obligor, whichever is later, shall be liable to the obligee in the amount of the wages required to be withheld.
(c) (1) Any employer who fails to withhold wages pursuant to a wage withholding order within 10 working days of receiving actual notice or upon the next payment of wages to the obligor, whichever is later, shall be liable to the obligee in the amount of the wages required to be withheld.

No employer who withholds wages from the obligor shall, without good cause, fail to forward payment to the registry for more than 30 days. An employer who violates this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $100.00 for a first violation and not more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation.

A proceeding pursuant to this section shall be heard by the Family Division of the Superior Court.

The employer may combine amounts withheld from the wages of more than one employee in a single payment to the registry, listing separately the amount of the payment that is attributable to each individual employee.

An employer shall only withhold wages from the nonexempt portion of the obligor’s wages as defined under section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (

15 U.S.C. § 1673(b))

.

An employer who makes an error in the amount of wages withheld shall not be held liable if the error was made in good faith.

On request of the Office of Child Support, the employer shall furnish the Social Security number and the amount of wages of any employee.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 11;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2004;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 788.
Parent’s responsibility.

Any parent subject to a child support or parental rights and responsibilities order shall notify in writing the court which issued the most recent order and the Office of Child Support of his or her current mailing address and current residence address and of any change in either address within seven business days of the change, until all obligations to pay support or support arrearages, or to provide for parental rights and responsibilities are satisfied. For good cause, the court may keep information provided under this subsection confidential.

When a wage withholding order is in effect, either parent shall notify in writing the registry of the name and address of a new employer within seven days of commencing new employment. If the Registry has received information that a parent has changed employment, it shall notify the other parent of the fact of the change but shall not disclose the identity or the location of the employer. On request of a parent, the Registry shall provide information on the other parent’s wages.

In all cases in which a temporary or final order for relief from abuse has been entered, information provided under this section shall be kept confidential by the court. The court, for good cause shown, may release such information.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 12;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 63

, § 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2017, No. 11

, § 45.

§ 789.
Wage withholding exemptions; priorities and limitations.

A wage withholding order for a current support obligation or an obligation to pay support arrearages shall not be subject to Rule 4.2(j) of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure or

12 V.S.A. §§ 3167

, 3169, 3170(a), (b) and (d). It shall be subject to section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (

15 U.S.C. § 1673(b))

.

A wage withholding order under this chapter shall have priority over other legal process against the same wages and shall be at least in the amount of the current support order. A wage withholding order for a current support obligation shall have priority over periodic payments to be applied to unpaid support arrearages, but shall not preclude withholding for both. No withholding for an arrearage may occur unless there is available income which is not exempt under section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (

15 U.S.C. § 1673(b))

.

Wage withholding shall cease upon the termination of the obligation to pay current support or upon the repayment of all arrearages, whichever is later.

If wage withholding is sought for repayment of outstanding arrearages in addition to support previously ordered, the additional amounts withheld for repayment shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the obligor’s support obligation existing at the time of issuance of the wage withholding order.

If arrearages exist after termination of the obligation to pay support, the amount withheld shall not be reduced until all arrearages are paid in full.

If an obligor’s outstanding arrearage increases by one-twelfth of the annual obligation, the Office of Child Support may notify an employer to withhold an additional amount for repayment of any outstanding arrearage that has accumulated since the issuance of the most recent court order. The total wage withholding for arrearages shall not exceed 25 percent of the obligor’s support obligation unless an additional amount is requested by the obligor.

The Office of Child Support shall not notify an employer to withhold an additional amount under subsection (f) of this section without first notifying the obligor of its intention to do so at the obligor’s last known address as provided pursuant to subsection 783(b) of this title and giving the obligor 20 days to contest the withholding pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4108

on the grounds the increase would be improper due to a mistake of fact.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 13;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1997, No. 63

, § 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

§ 790.
Employee protected; penalty.

No employee may be discharged from employment or subjected to disciplinary action on account of a wage withholding order issued to an employer against earnings. Any employee discharged or subjected to disciplinary action in violation of this section may bring an action in superior court for reinstatement of employment, back wages and damages and, if that employee prevails, the court shall award costs and may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the employee.

An employer who discharges or subjects an employee to disciplinary action in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine of $100.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 63

, § 14;

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 791.
Arrearage judgment lien.

A judgment issued by the court for support arrearages in excess of one-twelfth of the annualized amount of support shall constitute an arrearage judgment lien, if properly recorded under this section. The court shall also issue an order that payment of support shall be made through the Registry.
(a) (1) A judgment issued by the court for support arrearages in excess of one-twelfth of the annualized amount of support shall constitute an arrearage judgment lien, if properly recorded under this section. The court shall also issue an order that payment of support shall be made through the Registry.

If payments are being made through the Registry, a sworn affidavit of the Office of Child Support, establishing an arrearage in excess of one-quarter of the annualized amount of support attached to the underlying court order shall constitute an arrearage lien, if properly recorded under this section.

Before filing a lien provided for in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the Office of Child Support shall serve the obligor pursuant to subsection 783(b) of this title with notice of the amount of the past due child support, the consequences of the filing of the lien, and the procedure for contesting the arrearage and challenging the lien pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4108

. If the obligor does not contest the notice of lien within 20 days of service, the Office may record the lien under this section. For the purposes of this section, such a lien shall be considered an arrearage judgment lien.

A copy of any document recorded under this subsection shall be sent to the parties by certified mail.

An arrearage judgment lien shall be recorded in accordance with

12 V.S.A. § 2904

with the clerk in any town where real property owned by the obligor may be found, or in the case of personal property in the proper place for recording a security interest under Title 9A, article 9. The judgment shall become a lien for the amount of support arrearages at the time the judgment is issued and any arrearages that accrue after that time and until the lien is released. The judgment shall not become a lien for any sum or sums prior to the date they severally become due and payable.

Within 10 days of the request of the obligor, the Office of Child Support shall issue a certificate of release of an arrearage judgment lien if:

liability for the amount due has been satisfied or has become enforceable by reason of lapse of time; or

the interest of the obligee in the property has no value.

If the Office of Child Support does not issue a release of lien within 10 days or if there is a disagreement over the amount of arrearages, the obligor may request the court to determine the amount of arrearages or to issue a release of lien, or both. The court shall schedule a hearing to be held within 14 days of the request. The court may issue a release of lien without requiring the obligor to satisfy his or her liability for the total amount due if it finds that justice so requires.

A certificate of release of lien applicable to real property and issued by the Office of Child Support or the court shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The lien created pursuant to this section shall be effective eight years from the date of issuance of the judgment or eight years after termination of the obligation to pay support, whichever is later. If the lien is not satisfied within 30 days of recording, it may be foreclosed and redeemed as provided in Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure Rule 80.1.

The lien created by this section shall be in addition to and separate from any other remedy or interest created by law or contract.

Upon compliance with subsection (a) of this section, this State shall accord full faith and credit to arrearage liens that arise in another state if the other state accords reciprocity to this State’s arrearage liens.

I hereby certify that the judgment for child support arrearages is paid in full and that the lien recorded in book , page of the land records of the town of is satisfied. A certificate of release of lien which is recorded by the town clerk in the land records shall release the lien and bar actions brought thereon.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

1997, No. 63

, §§ 14, 14a, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2017, No. 11

, § 46.

§ 792.
Lottery offset.

For all Vermont Lottery games, the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery shall, before issuing prize money of $500.00 or more to a winner, determine whether the winner has an outstanding child support arrearage payable to the Office of Child Support. If the winner has a child support arrearage, the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery shall withhold the entire amount of winnings and pay the same to the Office of Child Support. The Office of Child Support shall offset the winnings by the amount of support arrearages and the remainder of the winnings, if any, shall be sent to the winner. The obligor shall be notified by the Office of Child Support of the offset prior to payment to the obligee and given a period not to exceed 20 days to contest the accuracy of the information.

The Office of Child Support shall inform the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery of persons with child support arrearages upon request. Each liable person shall be identified by name, address, and Social Security number.

This section shall apply to Tri-State Lottery games at such time as the same or similar provisions become law in Maine and New Hampshire in accordance with the Tri-State Lotto Compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

2019, No. 73

, § 24.

§ 793.
Credit reporting.

Information regarding the amount of arrearages owed by an obligor may be made available by the Office of Child Support to any consumer credit bureau organization upon the request of the organization, only if the amount of the arrearages is at least one-quarter of the annual support obligation and the Office of Child Support has notified the obligor by first-class mail or other means likely to give actual notice of the proposed action and given a period not to exceed 20 days to contest the accuracy of the information with the Office of Child Support. In computing the amount of an arrearage, any arrearage accumulated after a motion to modify has been filed shall not be included.

The Office of Child Support shall immediately notify each credit bureau organization to which information has been furnished of any increases or decreases in the account balance.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 28; amended

1997, No. 63

, § 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

§ 794.
Tax offsets.

An order for child support may be enforced as provided in 32 V.S.A. chapter 151.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 795.
Licenses or governmental contracts.

As used in this section:

“Agency” means any unit of state government, including agencies, departments, boards, commissions, authorities, or public corporations.

“License” means any license, certification, or registration issued by an agency to conduct a trade or business, including a license to practice a profession or occupation, or a license required to engage in recreational activities, including the license to hunt, fish, or trap.

“Contract” means a contract for the provision of goods, services or real estate space.

Every applicant for a license shall sign a statement that the applicant is not subject to a child support order, or if subject to a child support order is in good standing with respect to the order or in full compliance with a plan to pay any and all child support payable under a support order as of the date the application is filed. A license may not be issued or renewed without such a statement.

No agency shall enter into, extend, or renew any contract unless the person submits a statement that the person is not under an obligation to pay child support or is in good standing with respect to or in full compliance with a plan to pay any and all child support payable under a support order as of the date the contract is made.

For the purposes of this section, a person is in good standing with respect to any and all support payable if:

less than one-twelfth of the annual support obligation is overdue; or

liability for any support payable is being contested in a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding; or

the person is in compliance with a repayment plan approved by the office of child support or agreed to by the parties; or

in the case of a licensee, the licensing agency finds that requiring immediate payment of support due and payable would impose an unreasonable hardship.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 29; amended

1997, No. 63

, § 16, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 796.
Assets held in escrow.

If a proceeding for enforcement of child support has previously been brought against an obligor under this subchapter and the obligor at any time thereafter fails to pay support in an amount equal to one-twelfth of the annual support obligation, the court may, in addition to any other remedies under this subchapter, order that existing liquid assets be held in escrow by the court sufficient to secure payment of support for a period not to exceed four months.
If the obligor fails to pay support in an amount equal to one-twelfth of the annual support obligation, the assets held in escrow shall be applied toward unpaid support.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 797.
Civil penalties.

The court may impose a civil penalty to be paid to the obligee or to the registry on behalf of the obligee of not more than 10 percent on any amount in arrears for 30 days or more if the court determines that the arrearage was willful.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 798.
Enforcement of child support orders; suspension of licenses.

Upon noncompliance with an order issued under section 606 of this title, a motion may be filed seeking an order for suspension of licenses under this section. The motion shall be scheduled for hearing in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Family Proceedings within 30 days of the filing of the motion. At a hearing under this subsection, the obligor shall have the opportunity to present evidence relating to the reasons for noncompliance. An inability to comply shall be a defense in an action brought under this subsection. The noncomplying party shall have the burden of demonstrating inability to comply. An order issued under subsection (c) of this section is in addition to other remedies available at law.

The Office of Child Support may administratively suspend licenses under this section upon noncompliance with an order under section 606 of this title. Prior to suspending a license, the Office of Child Support shall notify the obligor of the Office’s intent to suspend the obligor’s license and shall provide the obligor with an opportunity to contest the action pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4108

. If the obligor fails to either contest the claimed delinquency or request an opportunity to present evidence relating to the noncompliance within 21 days of notification, the Office of Child Support may issue a license suspension order.

Upon a finding of noncompliance with an order issued under section 606 of this title and a delinquency of at least one-quarter of the annual support obligation, the Office of Child Support, or a judge or magistrate of a Family Division of the Superior Court, if assigned by the presiding judge of such court, may order a civil suspension of a noncomplying party’s motor vehicle operator’s license issued under 23 V.S.A. chapter 9 or commercial driver license issued under 23 V.S.A. chapter 39, recreational license, and any other license certification or registration issued by an agency to conduct a trade or business, including a license to practice a profession or occupation.

Upon receipt of a license suspension order issued under this section, the license issuing authority shall suspend the license according to the terms of the order. Prior to suspending the license, the license issuing authority shall notify the license holder of the pending suspension and provide the license holder with an opportunity to contest the suspension based solely on the grounds of mistaken identity or compliance with the underlying child support order. The license shall be reinstated within five business days of a reinstatement order from the court or notification from the Office of Child Support or the custodial parent, where the rights of that parent have not been assigned to the Office of Child Support, that the parent is in compliance with the underlying child support order. The license issuing authority shall charge a reinstatement fee as provided for in

23 V.S.A. § 675

, or as otherwise provided by law or rule.

The license issuing authority shall adopt procedural rules in accordance with the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 59

, § 11; amended

1997, No. 63

, § 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C16;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2017, No. 11

, § 47.

§ 799.
Trustee process.

As used in this section, “trustee” means any person, institution, or entity, holding any money, personal property, or real property that belongs to or is owed to the obligor, including judgments, settlements, lottery winnings, funds held in financial institutions, and any voluntary contributions to public and private retirement funds.

Upon noncompliance with a child support order in excess of one-quarter of the annual support obligation, the Office of Child Support may seek to attach assets owned by an obligor and held by a trustee. Prior to attaching assets held by a trustee, the Office of Child Support shall notify the obligor of the delinquency and of the Office’s intent to take administrative enforcement action for liens and trustee process and shall provide the obligor with an opportunity to contest the claimed delinquency and enforcement action pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4108

. If the obligor fails to contest the claimed delinquency within 20 days after notification, or upon a final determination of a delinquency after hearing, the Office of Child Support may issue a summons to a trustee as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

If no timely contest is made or upon a final determination of nonpayment of child support equal to or greater than one-quarter of the annual support obligation, the Office of Child Support may issue one or more summons to the trustee. The sum of the amounts for which the goods, effects, or credits of the obligor are attached on trustee process shall not exceed the amount determined to be delinquent under subsection (b) of this section. The Office of Child Support shall serve on the trustee and the obligor a disclosure form and a notice of the exemptions under subsection (f) of this section. If at any time the Office finds the outstanding arrearage has been satisfied in whole or in part, the Office shall discharge any trustee process that is outstanding or reduce the amounts for which the goods, effects, or credits of the obligor are attached so the sum of all such amounts does not exceed the amount that remains unsatisfied. The Office shall promptly notify the trustee and obligor of the change.

In the event the obligor or other aggrieved person contests the summons to the trustee pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4108

or appeals the proposed action to the Family Division of the Superior Court within 20 days of the summons and is found not to be in arrears by more than one-quarter of the annual support obligation on the date the summons to the trustee was issued, the Office, within two business days, shall discharge the trustee process and notify the trustee and the obligor. In addition, the Office shall pay to the obligor or other aggrieved person the sum of $500.00.

Upon receipt of a summons, the trustee shall secure and hold the assets in its possession up to the amount specified in the summons, and shall serve a disclosure under oath on the Office of Child Support and the obligor. If no timely contest is made or upon a final determination of any contest sustaining the trustee process, the trustee shall tender to the Office of Child Support the assets of the obligor in its possession up to the amount specified in the summons. If the trustee fails to disclose or fails or refuses to tender the property as directed, the Office of Child Support may file an action with the Family Division of the Superior Court to determine the trustee’s liability. A trustee shall not be liable to the obligor for complying with this section.

The exemptions from attachments and executions in

12 V.S.A. § 2740

shall apply to the trustee process provided for in this section except as follows:

the exemption in

12 V.S.A. § 2740

(15)

shall not exceed $400.00;

the exemption in

12 V.S.A. § 2740(16)

shall not exceed $5,000.00; and

the exemption in

12 V.S.A. § 2740(18)

shall not apply.

Upon notifying a trustee to attach voluntary retirement funds, the Office shall give the obligor an opportunity to have the attachment removed by making alternate payment arrangements satisfactory to the Office within 30 days of issuance of the summons.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 63

, § 17a, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 800.
Contract with sheriff for service of civil process.

The Office of Child Support may contract with a sheriff’s department for the purpose of locating and investigating child support obligors and serving process, warrants, and mittimus in child support cases.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C19.